District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0345.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Medical Cannabis Conditional Licensure Extension Temporary
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 7 of the Legalization of Marijuana for Medical Treatment Initiative of
1999, effective July 27, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-210; D.C. Official Code § 7-1671.06), is amended as
follows:
(a) Subsection (k) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “a 2-year conditional license”
and inserting the phrase “a conditional license valid for up to 3 years” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “shall have 2 years from the
date of ABC Board approval” and inserting the phrase “shall have until the end of the term of the
conditional license” in its place.
(3) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the phrase “after a period of 2 years” and
inserting the phrase “before the end of the term of the conditional license” in its place.
(b) Subsection (k-1) is amended to read as follows:
“(k-1) A one-year conditional license that was in effect as of December 17, 2024, and
that automatically converted to a 2-year conditional license, shall automatically convert to a 3-
year conditional license, expiring 2 years after the date the original conditional license was set to
expire, at no additional cost and without additional ABC Board approval.”.
(c) Subsection (l) is amended by striking the phrase “A one-year conditional license” and
inserting the phrase “A conditional license” in its place.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
This act shall apply as of June 28, 2025.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
(a) This act take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2